hyphen-patterns/ushyph.txt
r5sw
r5usc
r5vest
ra3bi
ra3chu
ra3mou
ra3or
ra4lo
ra4me3triz
ra5no
ra5vai
ra5zie
rach4e
radi1o6g
raf4t
raf5fi
ram3et
ran4ge
ran4has
rane5o
rap3er
rar5c
rar5ef
rare4
ration4
rau4t
rav3el
rb4o
rb5ing.
rbi2
rbi4f
rc4it
rcen4
rch4er
rcum3
rd2i
rd3ing
rdi4a
rdi4er
rdin4
re1al
re1de
re1li
re1o
re1pu
re2f1orma
re2fe
re3an
re3dis
re3fi
re3str
re3tri
re4aw
re4cipr
re4cre
re4fac
re4fy
re4posi
re4spi
re4ter
re4ti4z
re4tribu
re4val
re4wh
re5arr
re5fer.
re5it
re5lu
re5pin
re5ru
re5stal
re5uti
re5vers
re5vert
re5vil
rec4ogn
rec5oll
rec5ompe
rec5t6ang
red5it
reg3is
ren4te
rero4
res2t
ress5ib
reu2
rev2
rev3el
rev5olu
rfu4
rg2
rg3er
rg3ing
rgi4n
rgo4n
rh4
ri1er
ri1o
ri2pl
ri2tu
ri3a
ri3enc
ri3ent
ri3ta3b
ri4ag
ri4cie
ri5et
ria4b
rib3a
ric5as
rid5er
rig5an
ril3iz
rim4pe
rim5i
rin4d
rin4e
rin4g
rip5lic
riph5e
ris4c
ris4p
rit3ic
rit5er.
rit5ers
rit5ur
riv3et
riv3i
riv3ol
riv5el
rk3ho
rk4le
rk4lin
rl5ish
rle4
rm3ing
rm5ers
rma5c
rno4
ro1fe
ro3bot3
ro3cr
ro3pel
ro4e
ro4the
ro4ty
ro4va
ro5fil
ro5ker
ro5n4is
ro5ro
rob3l
roe4las
rok2
rom4i
rom4p
rom5ete
ron4al
ron4e
ron4ta
rop3ic
ror3i
ros4s
ros5per
rov5el
rox5
rp3ing
rp4h4
rp5er.
rre4c
rre4f
rre4st
rri4o
rri4v
rron4
rros4
rrys4
rs3es
rs4c
rs5er.
rsa5ti
rse4cr
rse5v2
rson3
rt4sh
rt5ib
rtach4
rte5o
rten4d
rti4d
rtil3i
rtil4l
rtroph4
ru2n
ru3a
ru3e4l
ru3en
ru3in
ru4gl
rum3pl
run4ty
runk5
ruti5n
rv4e
rv5er.
rvel4i
rvi4v
ry3t
ry4c
rz3sc
s1ap
s1cu
s1e4s
s1l2
s1n4
s1r
s1sa
s1si
s1tic
s1tle
s2h
s2ina
s2le
s2phe
s2s5c
s2tag
s2tal
s2ty
s3act
s3ing
s3ket
s3lat
s3ma
s3sel
s3the
s3tif
s4ced
s4ces
s4chitz
s4cho
s4cli
s4erl
s4ogamy
s4op
s4pace
s4pacin
s4ply
s4pon
s4sa3chu
s4ses.
s4sian.
s4sie
s4sl
s4sn
s4ta4p
s4tamp
s4tants
s4ted
s4ti.
s4tie
s4top
s4trad
s4tray
s4trid
s4ul
s4y
s5edl
s5ened
s5enin
s5icc
s5men
s5ophiz
s5ophy
s5quito
s5seng
s5set
s5tero
s5tia
sa2
sa5lo
sa5ta
sa5vor
sac3ri
sal4m
sal4t
salar4
sales5c
sales5w
san4de
sat3u
sau4
sca4p
sca4tol
sca6p1er
scan4t5
scav5
sch2
sci4utt
scle5
scof4
scour5a
scy4th
se1le
se1mi6t1ic
se2c3o
se2g
se4a
se4d4e
se4mol
se5sh
sea5w
seas4
seg3r
sen4d
sen5at
sen5g
sep3a3
sep5temb
ser4o
ses5t
sev3en
sew4i
sh1er
sh1in
sh3io
sh5old
shiv5
sho4
shoe5st
shon3
shor4
short5
si1b
si2r
si5diz
side5st
side5sw
sil4e
sion5a
sir5a
sk2
sk5ine
sk5ing
sky3sc
slith5
small3
sman3
smel4
smol5d4
so3lic
so4ce
so4lab
so4lute
so5vi
soft3
sol3d2
son4g
sona4
sor5c
sor5d
sp5ing
spa4n
spe5cio
spen4d
spher5o
spho5
spi4cil
spil4
spokes5w
spor4
sports5c
sports5w
squal4l
ss2t
ss3hat
ss4li
ss5ily
ss5w
ssas3
ssi4er
sspend4
ssur5a
st2i
st3ing
st4r
st5b
st5scr
sta3ti
stam4i
star5tli
ste2w
stern5i
stew5a
stom3a
stor5ab
strat5ag
strib5ut
stupi4d
styl5is
su1al
su2g3
su2m
su2n
su2per1e6
su2r
su4b3
su5is
suit3
sum3i
sw2
swimm6
sy5rin
syn5o
sythi4
t1cr
t1wh
t2ina
t3ess.
t4ch
t4ic1u
t4ico
t4sc
t4sw
t4tes
t5la
t5let.
t5lo
t5to
t6ap6ath
ta2l
ta3gon.
ta3min
ta3riz
ta4tur
ta5bles
ta5do
ta5la
ta5log
ta5mo
ta5per
ta5pl
ta5sy
tai5lo
tal3i
tal4lis
tal5en
talka5
tan4de
tanta3
tar4a
tar4rh
tas4e
taun4
tav4
tax4is
tch3c
tch5ed
tch5et
tch5ier
te2ma2
te4p
te5di
te5ger
te5gi
te5pe
tead4i
tece4
teg4
tele1r6o
tele4g
teli4
tem3at
ten4tag
ter3c
ter3is
ter5ies
ter5v
teri5za
tess4es
teth5e
th2e
th3eas
th5ic.
th5ica
th5ode
tha4lam
than4
the3is
the5at
tho5don
tho5geni
tho5riz
thok4er
thor5it
thy3sc
thy4lan
ti3sa
ti3tl
ti3za
ti3zen
ti4ab
ti4ato
ti4nom
ti4u
ti5fy
ti5oc
ti5so
tif2
till5in
tim5ul
tion5ee
tis4m
tis4p
tiv4a
tlan4
tli4er
tme4
to2gr
to2ma
to2ra
to3b
to3my
to3nat
to3rie
to3war
to5crat
to5ic
tom4b
ton4ali
tor5iz
tos2
tot3ic
tr4ial.
tra3b
tra5ch
tra5ven
tra5vers
trac4it
trac4te
traci4
trai5tor
tras4
trav5es5
tre4m
tre5f
treach5e
trem5i
tri4v
tri5ces
tro3sp
tro3v
tro5fit
tro5mi
tro5phe
tron5i
trop4is
tropo5les
tropo5lis
tropol5it
tru5i
trus4
tsch5ie
tsh4
ttribut5
ttu4
tu1a
tu3ar
tu4bi
tu4nis
tu5ry
tud2
tur3is
tur5o
turn5ar
tw4
twis4
ty4pal
ty5ph
type3
tz4e
u1at
u1b4i
u1dic
u1ing
u1l4o
u1la
u1len
u1mi
u1ni
u1ou
u1pe
u1ra
u1rit
u1v2
u2ne
u2nin
u2ral.
u2su
u3ber
u3ble.
u3ca
u3cr
u3cu
u3fl
u3lu
u3pl
u3rif
u3rio
u3ru
u3sic
u3tat
u3tine
u3u
u4b5ing
u4bel
u4bero
u4cy
u4don
u4du
u4ene
u4m3ing
u4ors
u4rag
u4ras
u4t1l
u4tis
u4tou
u5dit
u5j
u5lati
u5lia
u5os
u5pia
u5sad
u5san
u5sia
u5ton
ua5na
uac4
uan4i
uar2d
uar3i
uar3t
uar5ant
uav4
ub4e
uc4it
uci4b
ucle3
ud3er
ud3ied
ud3ies
ud4si
ud5d
ud5est
ud5is
udev4
uen4te
uens4
uer4il
ug5in
ugh3en
ui4n
uil5iz
uir4m
uita4
uiv3
uiv4er.
ul1ti
ul2i
ul3der
ul3ing
ul4e
ul4gi
ul4lar
ul4li4b
ul4lis
ul5ish
ul5ul
ul5v
ula5b
ulch4
uls5es
ultra3
um2p
um4bi
um4bly
um5ab
umor5o
un3s4
un4er
un4im
un4sw
un4ter.
un4tes
un5ish
un5y
un5z
unat4
uni3v
unt3ab
unu4
up3ing
up3p
uper5s
upport5
upt5ib
uptu4
ur1d
ur1in
ur2l
ur3iz
ur3the
ur4be
ur4fer
ur4fr
ur4no
ur4pe
ur4pi
ur4tie
ur5tes
urc4
ure5at
uri4fic
url5ing.
uros4
urs5er
urti4
us1p
us1tr
us3ci
us4ap
us4lin
us5sl
us5tere
usc2
use5a
usur4
ut3ing
ut5of
uta4b
uten4i
uti5liz
ution5a
uto5g
uto5matic
uts4
uu4m
uxu3
uz4e
v1in
v2inc
v3ativ
v3el.
v3eren
v3i3liz
v3if
v3io4r
v4e2s
v4ely
v4erd
v4erel
v4eres
v4y
v5enue
v5ereig
v5ole
va4ge
va5lie
va5mo
va5niz
va5pi
va6guer
vac3u
vac5il
vag4
val1u
val5o
var5ied
ve4lo
ve4te
ve4ty
veg3
vel3li
ven3om
ver3ie
ver3th
ver5enc
vermi4n
ves4te
vet3er
vi1ou
vi3so
vi3su
vi4p
vi5ali
vi5gn
vi5ro
vik4
vin5d
vio3l
vis3it
vit3r
vo4la
vo4ry
vo4ta
voi4
voice5p
vom5i
vor5ab
vori4
w1b
w1er
w3c
w3ev
w3sh
w4k
w4no
w5abl
w5al.
w5p
w5s4t
wa1te
wa5ger
wa5ver
wag5o
wait5
wam4
war4t
was4t
waste3w6
waveg4
wea5rie
weath3
wed4n
wee5v
week3n
weet3
wel4l
west3
whi4
wi2
wide5sp
wil2
will5in
win4de
win4g
wir4
with3
wiz5
wl3in
wl4es
wo4ken
wo5ven
wom1
wra4
wrap5aro
wri4
writa4
ws4l
ws4pe
wy4
x1a
x1e
x1h
x1q
x1t2
x1u
x2ed
x3c2
x3i
x3o
x3p
x3ti
x4ago
x4ap
x4ime
x4ob
xac5e
xam3
xas5
xe4cuto
xe5ro
xer4i
xhi2
xhil5
xhu4
xi5a
xi5c
xi5di
xi5miz
xpan4d
xpe3d
xpecto5
xquis3
xu3a
xx4
y1b
y1c
y1d
y1er
y1i
y1o4
y1w
y2ce
y3ch
y3la
y3lo
y3po
y3ro
y3s2e
y3stro
y3thin
y4erf
y4o5g
y4ons
y4os
y4ped
y4poc
y4so
y5ac
y5at
y5ched
y5ee
y5gi
y5lu
y5pu
yc5er
ych4e
ycom4
ycot4
ye4t
yes4
ylla5bl
ym5etry
ymbol5
yme4
ympa3
yn3chr
yn5d
yn5g
yn5ic
yo5d
yo5net
yom4
yp2ta
yp3i
yper5
yr4r
yr5ia
yra5m
ys1t
ys3ica
ys3io
ys3ta
ys4c
yss4
ysur4
yt3ic
z1er
z2z3w
z4il
z4is
z4zy
z5a2b
za1
zar2
ze3ro
ze4n
ze4p
zet4
zo4m
zo5ol
zte4
% exceptions
as-so-ciate
as-so-ciates
dec-li-na-tion
oblig-a-tory
phil-an-thropic
present
presents
project
projects
reci-procity
re-cog-ni-zance
ref-or-ma-tion
ret-ri-bu-tion
ta-ble
